morph.lexc
LEXICON AdvPart
%<Adv%:partial%>:@RB        ENDLEX;
                  
LEXICON QAdv
%<Adv%:qst%>:@RB  AdvCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Adv%:mredup%:qst%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdvCont;
#endif

LEXICON QAdj
%<Adj%:qst%>:@RB  AdjCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Adj%:mredup%:qst%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdjCont;
#endif

LEXICON AdvTime
%<Adv%>:@RB         AdvTimeCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Adv%:mredup%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdvTimeCont;
#endif

LEXICON QAdvTime
%<Adv%:qst%>:@RB    AdvTimeCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Adv%:mredup%:qst%>:@MREFUP@RB  AdvCont;
#endif

LEXICON AdvTimeCont
                    Ki;
                    AdvCont;
                    D_lArI;
                    D_lIGInA;
                    CliticSA;

LEXICON AdvCont
                ENDLEX;
                Aderiv;


!
! Rules governing pronouns
!
! TODO: -(y)ken added to som bare pronouns

LEXICON Prn
%<Prn%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON PrnNeg
%<Prn%:neg%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON PrnCont  ! this is all, except compounding
    ENDLEX;
    Pderiv;
    NcompCont;

LEXICON PersPrn1s
%<Prn%:pers%:1s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnPlu;
%<Prn%:pers%:1s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnCont;
LEXICON PersPrn2s
%<Prn%:pers%:2s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnPlu;
%<Prn%:pers%:2s%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnCont;
LEXICON PersPrnPlu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PersPrn3s
%<Prn%:pers%:3s%>:@RB PersPrnCont;
%<Prn%:pers%>:@RB PersPrn3sPlu;
LEXICON PersPrn3sPlu
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB      PersPrnCont;
                    ENDLEX;

LEXICON PersPrn1p
%<Prn%:pers%:1p%>:@PRN@RB PersPrnContPL;
LEXICON PersPrn2p
%<Prn%:pers%:2p%>:@RB PersPrnContPL;
LEXICON PersPrn3p
%<Prn%:pers%:3p%>:@RB PersPrnContPL;

LEXICON PrnBiri
%<Prn%:pers%>:@RB       PrnBiriCont;

LEXICON PrnBiriCont
                        PrnPagr3s;
                        PrnPagr3p;
                        PrnPagr1p2p;
                        PersPrnCont;
                        PrnPlu;

LEXICON PrnHicbiri
%<Prn%:neg%>:@RB             PrnHicbiriCont;

LEXICON PrnHicbiriCont
                        PrnPagr3s;
                        PrnPagr1p2p;
                        PersPrnCont;
                        PrnPlu;

! this is only 'kendi'
LEXICON PrnRfl
%<Prn%:refl%>:@RB PrnRflCont;

LEXICON PrnRflCont
                    PrnPagr;
                    PersPrnCont;
                    PrnPlu;

LEXICON PrnPlu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      PrnPagr1p2p;

LEXICON PrnPagr
            PrnPagr3p;
            PrnPagr3s;
            PrnPagr1p2p;
            PrnPagr1s2s;

LEXICON PrnPagr3p
%<3p%>:l^Ar^I@MB      PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PrnPagr3s
%<3s%>:^(s)^I@MB      PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PrnPagr1s2s
%<1s%>:^(I)m@MB       PersPrnCont;
%<2s%>:^(I)n@MB       PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PrnPagr1p2p
%<1p%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB    PersPrnCont;
%<2p%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB    PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PersPrnCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    Ncase;
                    ND_CA;
                    D_lI;
                    ND_lIk;
                    NomPredicate;

LEXICON PersPrnContPL
                Nplu;
                PersPrnCont;

LEXICON PersPrn
%<Prn%:pers%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON PPrnBirBir
%<Prn%:rcp%>:@RB BirBirCont;

LEXICON BirBirCont
                        PrnPagr3p;
                        PrnPagr1p2p;
%<3p%>:^(s)^I@MB        PersPrnCont;
                        PrnPlu;

LEXICON PrnContNoPlu
        Npos;
        Ncase;

LEXICON DemPrn
%<Prn%:dem%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON QPrn
%<Prn%:qst%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON QPrnLoc
%<Prn%:qst%:locp%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON QPrnPers
%<Prn%:qst%:pers%>:@RB PrnCont;

LEXICON LocPrn  ! TODO: these do not inflect except only in some fixed expressions
%<Prn%:locp%>:@RB PrnCont;

!
! Determiners
!

LEXICON  DetDef
%<Det%:def%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndefNeg
%<Det%:indef%:neg%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndef
%<Det%:indef%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndef_typo
#if (MARK_TYPOS == 1) 
%<Det%:indef%:typo%>:@RB    DetCont;
#else
                            DetIndef;
#endif

LEXICON  DetDefQ
%<Det%:def%:qst%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON  DetIndefQ
%<Det%:indef%:qst%>:@RB DetCont;

LEXICON DetCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    JP_poss;    ! TODO: not all determiners do this.

! Date/time

LEXICON DateStem
%<Num%:date%>:@RB             DateTimeCont;
LEXICON TimeStem
%<Num%:time%>:@RB             DateTimeCont;

LEXICON DateTimeCont
0:@APOS@MB         Ncont;
#if (APOSTROPHE_OPTIONAL_NUM == 1) 
                    Ncont;
#endif

! Number inflections and derivations

LEXICON NumStem
%<Num%>:@RB  NumCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Num%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB  NumCont;
#endif

LEXICON Num_typo
#if (MARK_TYPOS == 1) 
%<Num%:typo%>:@RB   NumCont;
%<Num%:mredup%:typo%>:@MREDUP@RB  NumCont;
#else
                    NumStem;
#endif

LEXICON QNum
%<Num%:qst%>:@RB  NumCont;
%<Num%:qst%>:@MREDUP@RB  NumCont;

LEXICON  NumHalf
buçu^k  NumStem;

LEXICON NumCont
                ENDLEX;
                NumDeriv;
                JP_poss;    ! ikimiz, yedisi, yüzünüz

LEXICON NumericStem
%<Num%:ara%>:@RB             NumericCont;    
!%<Num%>%<dig%>:@RB     NumericCont;    

LEXICON RomanStem
%<Num%:rom%>:@RomNum@RB      NumericCont;
!%<Num%>%<rom%>:@RB     NumericCont;    

LEXICON NumericCont
                ENDLEX;
                NumericApos;
                NumericDotOrd;

LEXICON NumericApos
0:%@APOS@MB      NumDeriv;
0:%@APOS@MB      JP_poss;
#if (APOSTROPHE_OPTIONAL_NUM == 1) 
                 NumDeriv;
                 JP_poss;
#endif

LEXICON NumericDotOrd
%<ord%>:%.@MB      NumericDotOrdCont;

LEXICON   NumericDotOrdCont
                 ENDLEX;
0:%@APOS@MB      AdjCont;
#if (APOSTROPHE_OPTIONAL_NUM == 1) 
                 AdjCont;
#endif

LEXICON NumDeriv
                        NumOrd; 
                        NumDist; 
                        Num_PluCA; 
                        Mderiv;

! this takes care of words like 'on-lar-ca'
! TODO: restrict this. There is no 'onbir-ler-ce'
LEXICON Num_PluCA 
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      MD_CA;

LEXICON NumOrd
%<ord%>:^(I)nc^I@MB    NumOrdCont;

LEXICON NumOrdCont
            ENDLEX;
            AdjCont;

LEXICON NumDist
%<dist%>:^(ş)^Ar@MB       NumDistCont;

LEXICON NumDistCont
            D_lI;
            ENDLEX;



!
! Verbal morphology starts here
!


! this is for regular verbs: 
!  - aorist form is -(I)r
!  - causative is predictable from the final phoneme
!  - no reflexive or reciprocal is allowed

LEXICON V
%<V%>:@RB   VCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCont;
#endif

LEXICON VPartLast
%<V%:partial%>:@RB   VCont;

LEXICON VPart
%<V%:partial%>:@RB   ENDLEX;

LEXICON   VCont
                Vderiv;
                Vinfl;
                AbilPartial;

LEXICON   Vinfl
                    VCausRegular;
                    VCausRegularCont;

LEXICON VNoCausCont
                    Vderiv;
                    VPassive;
                    VPassiveCont;
                    AbilPartial;
        
LEXICON VNoAorCont
                    VCausRegular;
                    VNoCausNoAorCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VNoCausNoAorCont
                    Vderiv;
                    VPassive;
                    VCabilNeg;
                    VNegative;
                    VComp;
                    NonFiniteVerbNoAor;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rcp
%<V%>:@RB   VRcpCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCont;
#endif

LEXICON   VRcpCont
                    VCont;
                    VRcp;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VRcp
%<rcp%>:^(I)ş@MB     VCont;


LEXICON V_Rfl
%<V%>:@RB   VRflCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflCont;
#endif

LEXICON   VRflCont
                    VCont;
                    VRfl;
                    AbilPartial;
LEXICON   VRfl
%<rfl%>:^(I)n@MB       VCont;

LEXICON  V_Rfl_Rcp
%<V%>:@RB   VRflRcpCont;
%<V%>:@RB   VRflRcpCont;

LEXICON  VRflRcpCont
                    VCont;
                    VRcp;
                    VRfl;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausDir
%<V%>:@RB           VCausDirCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausDirCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausDirCont
                    VCausDir;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausDir
%<caus%>:^D^Ir@MB      VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausIr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausIrCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausIrCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausIrCont
                    VCausIr;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausIr
%<caus%>:^Ir@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausIt
%<V%>:@RB           VCausItCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausItCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausItCont
                    VCausIt;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausIt
%<caus%>:^It@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_Rcp_CausDir
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpCausDirCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCausDirCont;
#endif

LEXICON VRcpCausDirCont
                    VRcp;
                    VCausDir;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

!LEXICON V_Rfl_CausDir
!%<V%>:@RB           VRflCausDirCont;

!LEXICON           VRflCausDirCont
!                    VRfl;
!                    VCausDir;
!                    VNoCausCont;

!LEXICON V_Rfl_Rcp_CausDir
!                    VRcp;
!                    VRfl;
!                    VCausDir;
!                    VNoCausCont;

LEXICON V_CausIrreg
%<V%>:@RB           VCausIrregCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausIrregCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausIrregCont
                  VNoCausCont;
                  AbilPartial;

! LEXICON V_Rcp_CausIrreg
!                 VNoCausCont;
!                 VRcpCont;

! LEXICON V_Rfl_CausIrreg
!                 VNoCausCont;
!                 VRflCont;

LEXICON V_Rfl_Rcp_CausIrreg
%<V%>:@RB           VRflRcpCausIrregCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflRcpCausIrregCont;
#endif

LEXICON VRflRcpCausIrregCont
                 VRfl;
                 VRcp;
                 VNoCausCont;
                 AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON  VAorAr
%<aor%>:^(A)r@MB   AorArCont;

LEXICON   AorArCont
                    TAMg1Cont;
                    CVcesinePagr;
                    VerbalAdj;
                    AbilPartial;
!                    DerivNCont;
!                    DerivJCont;

LEXICON V_Rcp_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON  VRcpAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VRcp;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rfl_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRflAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflAorArCont;
#endif


LEXICON  VRflAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VRfl;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON  V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRflRcpAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflRcpAorArCont;
#endif


LEXICON  VRflRcpAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VRfl;
            VRcp;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausDir_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausDirAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausDirAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausDirAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausDir;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausIr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausIrAorArCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausIrAorArCont;
#endif

LEXICON VCausIrAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausIr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;
